Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-504
General powers.

Such association may have power to prescribe the terms on which members may be admitted, the number of its trustees and other officers (subject to the limitations set forth in section 12-501), and the time and manner of their election and appointment, and the time and place of meeting for the trustees and for the association, and to pass all such other bylaws as may be necessary for the good government of such association, not inconsistent with this or any other statutes of the state, nor in violation of the Constitution.

R.S.1866, c. 25, § 48, p. 206;

R.S.1913, § 682;

Laws 1919, c. 27, § 1, p. 93;

C.S.1922, § 591;

C.S.1929, § 13-504;

R.S.1943, § 12-504.

Association has power to prescribe terms of membership, number of trustees, time and manner of their election, time and place of meetings, and to pass bylaws. State ex rel. Craig v. Offutt, 121 Neb. 76, 236 N.W. 174 (1931).